Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 3. Investigative Authority

§ 10-3-301.
Conducting investigations and hearings; accidents to be reported.

The commission may conduct investigations, inquiries and hearings concerning the laws of this state relating to aeronautics and accidents or injuries incident to the operation of aircraft, including unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, occurring within this state. Members of the commission may administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas and compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers, books and documents. All accidents or injuries incident to the operation of aircraft occurring within this state shall be immediately reported to the commission.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 10-19; W.S. 1977, § 10-2-106; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 2017 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, near the end of the first
sentence added “including unmanned aircraft” following
“operation of aircraft” and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 170, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

inserted “or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft” following “unmanned aircraft”.

Laws 2018, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Cross references. —

As officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 10-3-302.
Use in evidence of reports of investigations or hearings.

The reports of investigations or hearings shall only be used in proceedings instituted by or in behalf of the commission pursuant to the laws of this state relating to aeronautics.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 26, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 10-20; W.S. 1977, § 10-2-107; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.